Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RESIDENTIAL SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER FACILITIES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $25,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of administration for acquisition of property; predesign; design; site preparation, including demolition; construction; furnishing; and equipping new Direct Care and Treatment facilities in Carlton County for residential substance use disorder services. new text end new text begin (b) Upon substantial completion of the projects authorized in this section and after written notice to the commissioner of management and budget, the commissioner of administration must use any money remaining in the appropriation for asset preservation improvements and betterments of a capital nature at Direct Care and Treatment facilities statewide, to be spent in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.307. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $25,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end